Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5421
Certificate; director; grant or deny; notice and hearing requirements.

The director shall grant or deny a certificate within forty-five days of receipt of a completed application under section 44-5420. The director shall deny a certificate if the applicant does not meet the requirements of the Utilization Review Act. If a certificate is denied, the director shall notify the applicant by certified mail and shall specify the reasons for denial in the notice. The applicant shall have ten days from the date of receipt of the notice to request a hearing before the director pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, or he or she may reapply and respond to the reasons for the denial.

Laws 1992, LB 428, § 11;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 44-5411;

Laws 1998, LB 1162, § 6.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.